tools/snowball/algorithms/serbian.sbl
// Serbian stemmer, from the Snowball project: https://snowballstem.org/algorithms/serbian/stemmer.html
// This is serbian.sbl of Snowball 2.2.0 as it was published.
// Snowball is BSD licensed, see tools/snowball/LICENSE-SNOWBALL.
// Regenerate the stemmers with: pnpm stemmers

/* Stemmer for Serbian language, based on:
 *
 * Ljubesic, Nikola. Pandzic, Ivan. Stemmer for Croatian
 * http://nlp.ffzg.hr/resources/tools/stemmer-for-croatian/
 *
 * authors: Stefan Petkovic and Dragan Ivanovic
 * emails: petkovic8 at gmail.com and dragan.ivanovic at uns.ac.rs
 * version: 1.0 (20.04.2019)
*/

routines (
    cyr_to_lat
    prelude
    mark_regions
    R1
    Step_1
    Step_2
    Step_3
)

externals ( stem )

booleans ( no_diacritics )

integers ( p1 )

groupings ( v ca sa rg )

stringescapes {}

/* special characters - Unicode codepoints */

/* serbian cyrillic */

stringdef cyrA    '{U+0430}'
stringdef cyrB    '{U+0431}'
stringdef cyrV    '{U+0432}'
stringdef cyrG    '{U+0433}'
stringdef cyrD    '{U+0434}'
stringdef cyrDx   '{U+0452}'
stringdef cyrE    '{U+0435}'
stringdef cyrZh   '{U+0436}'
stringdef cyrZ    '{U+0437}'
stringdef cyrI    '{U+0438}'
stringdef cyrJ    '{U+0458}'
stringdef cyrK    '{U+043A}'
stringdef cyrL    '{U+043B}'
stringdef cyrLJ   '{U+0459}'
stringdef cyrM    '{U+043C}'
stringdef cyrN    '{U+043D}'
stringdef cyrNJ   '{U+045A}'
stringdef cyrO    '{U+043E}'
stringdef cyrP    '{U+043F}'
stringdef cyrR    '{U+0440}'
stringdef cyrS    '{U+0441}'
stringdef cyrT    '{U+0442}'
stringdef cyrCy   '{U+045B}'
stringdef cyrU    '{U+0443}'
stringdef cyrF    '{U+0444}'
stringdef cyrH    '{U+0445}'
stringdef cyrC    '{U+0446}'
stringdef cyrCx   '{U+0447}'
stringdef cyrDzx  '{U+045F}'
stringdef cyrSx   '{U+0448}'

/* serbian latin with diacritics */

stringdef cx    '{U+010D}' // small c with caron
stringdef cy    '{U+0107}' // small c with acute
stringdef zx    '{U+017E}' // small z with caron
stringdef sx    '{U+0161}' // small s with caron
stringdef dx    '{U+0111}' // small d with stroke

define v 'aeiou'
define sa '{cx}{cy}{zx}{sx}{dx}'
define ca 'bvgdzjklmnprstfhc' + sa
define rg 'r'


define cyr_to_lat as (

    do repeat goto (
        [substring] among (
            '{cyrA}'    (<- 'a')
            '{cyrB}'    (<- 'b')
            '{cyrV}'    (<- 'v')
            '{cyrG}'    (<- 'g')
            '{cyrD}'    (<- 'd')
            '{cyrDx}'   (<- '{dx}')
            '{cyrE}'    (<- 'e')
            '{cyrZh}'   (<- '{zx}')
            '{cyrZ}'    (<- 'z')
            '{cyrI}'    (<- 'i')
            '{cyrJ}'    (<- 'j')
            '{cyrK}'    (<- 'k')
            '{cyrL}'    (<- 'l')
            '{cyrLJ}'   (<- 'lj')
            '{cyrM}'    (<- 'm')
            '{cyrN}'    (<- 'n')
            '{cyrNJ}'   (<- 'nj')
            '{cyrO}'    (<- 'o')
            '{cyrP}'    (<- 'p')
            '{cyrR}'    (<- 'r')
            '{cyrS}'    (<- 's')
            '{cyrT}'    (<- 't')
            '{cyrCy}'   (<- '{cy}')
            '{cyrU}'    (<- 'u')
            '{cyrF}'    (<- 'f')
            '{cyrH}'    (<- 'h')
            '{cyrC}'    (<- 'c')
            '{cyrCx}'   (<- '{cx}')
            '{cyrDzx}'  (<- 'd{zx}')
            '{cyrSx}'   (<- '{sx}')
        )
    )

)

define prelude as (

    do repeat goto (
        ca ['ije'] ca <- 'e'
    )

    do repeat goto (
        ca ['je'] ca <- 'e'
    )

    do repeat goto (
        ['dj'] <- '{dx}'
    )

)

define mark_regions as (

    set no_diacritics

    do (
        gopast sa unset no_diacritics
    )

    $p1 = limit

    do (
        gopast v setmark p1
        ($p1 < 2) (
            gopast non-v
            setmark p1
        )
    )
    do (
        gopast 'r'
        $(cursor >= 2) or (gopast non-rg)
        $(p1 - cursor > 1) setmark p1
    )

)

backwardmode (

    define R1 as $p1 <= cursor

    define Step_1 as (
        [substring] among (
            'lozi'
            'lozima'        (<-'loga')
            'pesi'
            'pesima'        (<-'peh')
            'vojci'         (<-'vojka')
            'bojci'         (<-'bojka')
            'jaci'
            'jacima'        (<-'jak')
            '{cx}ajan'      (<-'{cx}ajni')
            'cajan'         (no_diacritics <-'cajni')
            'eran'          (<-'erni')
            'laran'         (<-'larni')
            'esan'          (<-'esni')
            'anjac'         (<-'anjca')
            'ajac'
            'ajaca'         (<-'ajca')
            'ljaca'
            'ljac'          (<-'ljca')
            'ejac'
            'ejaca'         (<-'ejca')
            'ojac'
            'ojaca'         (<-'ojca')
            'ajaka'         (<-'ajka')
            'ojaka'         (<-'ojka')
            '{sx}aca'
            '{sx}ac'        (<-'{sx}ca')
            'inzima'
            'inzi'          (<-'ing')
            'tvenici'       (<-'tvenik')
            'tetici'
            'teticima'      (<-'tetika')
            'nstava'        (<-'nstva')
            'nicima'        (<-'nik')
            'ticima'        (<-'tik')
            'zicima'        (<-'zik')
            'snici'         (<-'snik')
            'kuse'          (<-'kusi')
            'kusan'         (<-'kusni')
            'kustava'       (<-'kustva')
            'du{sx}an'      (<-'du{sx}ni')
            'dusan'         (no_diacritics <-'dusni')
            'antan'         (<-'antni')
            'bilan'         (<-'bilni')
            'tilan'         (<-'tilni')
            'avilan'        (<-'avilni')
            'silan'         (<-'silni')
            'gilan'         (<-'gilni')
            'rilan'         (<-'rilni')
            'nilan'         (<-'nilni')
            'alan'          (<-'alni')
            'ozan'          (<-'ozni')
            'rave'          (<-'ravi')
            'stavan'        (<-'stavni')
            'pravan'        (<-'pravni')
            'tivan'         (<-'tivni')
            'sivan'         (<-'sivni')
            'atan'          (<-'atni')
            'enat'          (<-'enta')
            'tetan'         (<-'tetni')
            'pletan'        (<-'pletni')
            '{sx}ave'       (<-'{sx}avi')
            'save'          (no_diacritics <-'savi')
            'anata'         (<-'anta')
            'a{cx}ak'
            'a{cx}aka'      (<-'a{cx}ka')
            'acak'
            'acaka'         (no_diacritics <-'acka')
            'u{sx}ak'       (<-'u{sx}ka')
            'usak'          (no_diacritics <-'uska')
            'atak'
            'ataka'
            'atci'
            'atcima'        (<-'atka')
            'etak'
            'etaka'         (<-'etka')
            'itak'
            'itaka'
            'itci'          (<-'itka')
            'otak'
            'otaka'         (<-'otka')
            'utak'
            'utaka'
            'utci'
            'utcima'        (<-'utka')
            'eskan'         (<-'eskna')
            'ti{cx}an'      (<-'ti{cx}ni')
            'tican'         (no_diacritics <-'ticni')
            'ojsci'         (<-'ojska')
            'esama'         (<-'esma')
            'metar'
            'metara'        (<-'metra')
            'centar'
            'centara'       (<-'centra')
            'istar'
            'istara'        (<-'istra')
            'o{sx}{cy}u'    (<-'osti')
            'oscu'          (no_diacritics <-'osti')
            'daba'          (<-'dba')
            '{cx}cima'
            '{cx}ci'        (<-'{cx}ka')
            'mac'
            'maca'          (<-'mca')
            'naca'
            'nac'           (<-'nca')
            'voljan'        (<-'voljni')
            'anaka'         (<-'anki')
            'vac'
            'vaca'          (<-'vca')
            'saca'
            'sac'           (<-'sca')
            'raca'
            'rac'           (<-'rca')
            'aoca'
            'alaca'
            'alac'          (<-'alca')
            'elaca'
            'elac'          (<-'elca')
            'olaca'
            'olac'
            'olce'          (<-'olca')
            'njac'
            'njaca'         (<-'njca')
            'ekata'
            'ekat'          (<-'ekta')
            'izam'
            'izama'         (<-'izma')
            'jebe'          (<-'jebi')
            'baci'          (<-'baci')
            'a{sx}an'       (<-'a{sx}ni')
            'asan'          (no_diacritics <-'asni')
        )
    )
